Hawaii statutes.
§633-36 Forms and public information.
For the more effective carrying out of this chapter, the chief justice, as
administrative head of the judiciary department, shall cause to be published a
booklet or pamphlet describing, in language readily understandable by a
layperson, the procedures of the small claims division of the district court,
the remedies available upon judgment in the small claims division of the
district court and such other information as will facilitate the utilization of
the small claims procedure and shall also cause to be made and printed such
standardized forms as may be utilized throughout the small claims procedure
prior to, upon and after judgment. [L 1970, c 182, pt of §1; am L 1971, c 144,
§29; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next